Wisconsin, session 2025, AB860.
do enact as follows:AB860,11Section 1. 301.034 of the statutes is created to read:AB860,3,102301.034 Know your rights resource guide. (1) Rights of adult 3inmates. (a) The department shall maintain a written resource guide that 4enumerates the rights of inmates of a state correctional institution. The resource 5guide under this paragraph shall account for specific restrictions or rights that are 6dependent upon an inmate’s legal status, confinement status, biological factors, and 7the institution in which the inmate is housed. The department shall update the 8resource guide under this paragraph once per year or within one week of a legal 1change or institutional process change that affects inmates’ rights. The 2department shall post the resource guide throughout each state correctional 3institution and provide copies to each inmate upon entering a state correctional 4institution, being placed under restricted movement, being placed in solitary 5confinement, or upon request at any time. The warden or superintendent of a state 6correctional institution, or a designee who has been trained to understand and 7explain the resource guide, shall explain to each inmate the contents of the resource 8guide maintained under this paragraph upon the inmate entering the state 9correctional institution, upon the inmate transferring between state correctional 10institutions, or upon request at any time.AB860,4,411(b) The sheriff shall maintain a written resource guide that enumerates the 12rights of inmates of a county jail or house of correction. The resource guide under 13this paragraph shall account for specific restrictions or rights that are dependent 14upon an inmate’s legal status, confinement status, biological factors, and the 15location in which the inmate is housed. The department of corrections shall direct 16the sheriff to update the resource guide under this paragraph once per year or 17within one week of a legal change that affects inmates’ rights. The sheriff shall also 18update the resource guide under this paragraph within one week of an institutional 19process change at the county jail or house of correction that affects inmates’ rights. 20The sheriff shall post the resource guide throughout the county jail or house of 21correction and provide copies to each inmate upon entering the county jail or house 22of correction, being placed under restricted movement, being placed in solitary 23confinement, or upon request at any time. The sheriff, or a designee who has been 1trained to understand and explain the resource guide, shall explain to each inmate 2the contents of the resource guide maintained under this paragraph upon the 3inmate entering the county jail or house of correction, upon the inmate transferring 4between county jails or houses of correction, or upon request at any time.AB860,4,135(2) Rights of juveniles. (a) The department shall maintain a written 6resource guide that enumerates the rights of all juveniles being held in a type 1 7juvenile correctional facility, a juvenile detention facility, a secured residential care 8center for children and youth, or juvenile portion of the county jail. The resource 9guide under this paragraph shall account for specific restrictions or rights that are 10dependent upon a juvenile’s legal status, confinement status, biological factors, and 11the location in which the juvenile is housed. The department shall update the 12resource guide under this paragraph once per year or within one week of a legal 13change that affects juveniles’ rights.AB860,4,1814(b) The department shall post throughout each type 1 juvenile correctional 15facility and provide copies of the resource guide maintained under par. (a) to each 16juvenile upon entering a type 1 juvenile correctional facility, being placed under 17restricted movement, being placed in solitary confinement, or upon request at any 18time.AB860,5,219(c) The department shall ensure that a requirement to post throughout the 20facility and provide copies of the resource guide maintained under par. (a) to each 21juvenile upon entering a facility, being placed under restricted movement, being 22placed in solitary confinement, or upon request at any time is included with the 1plan for any juvenile detention facility, secured residential care center for children 2and youth, or juvenile portion of the county jail approved under s. 938.22 (2) (a).AB860,5,83(d) The superintendent of a type 1 juvenile correctional facility, a juvenile 4detention facility, a secured residential care center for children and youth, or 5juvenile portion of the county jail, or a designee who has been trained to understand 6and explain the resource guide, shall explain to each juvenile the contents of the 7resource guide maintained under par. (a) upon the juvenile entering the facility, 8upon the juvenile transferring between facilities, or upon request at any time.AB860,29Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB860,5,1010(1) Contract for the creation of written resource guides.AB860,5,1611(a) During the 2025-26 fiscal year, the department of administration shall 12contract with a legal organization that has experience upholding the civil rights of 13inmates and juveniles in correctional institutions and jails for the initial 14development of the written resource guides that the department of corrections is 15required to maintain under s. 301.034. The contract under this paragraph shall 16require that the written resource guides shall be completed by June 30, 2027.AB860,5,1817(b) To be awarded the contract under par. (a), an organization shall 18demonstrate that it will do all of the following:AB860,5,20191. Engage representatives from state and local governments and prison 20reform and advocacy organizations in the development process.AB860,5,23212. Use at least 30 percent of the contract funds to employ individuals who 22were formerly incarcerated or detained in a Wisconsin state correctional institution 23or county jail to develop the written resource guides.AB860,5,24243. Complete development of the resource guides by June 30, 2027.AB860,31Section 3. Fiscal changes.AB860,6,52(1) Contract for written resource guides. In the schedule under s. 320.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department of administration under s. 420.505 (1) (a), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2025-26 is increased by $200,000 to 5contract under Section 2 (1) of this act for the creation of written resource guides.AB860,46Section 4. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 7publication, except as follows:AB860,6,98(1) Written resource guides. The treatment of s. 301.034 takes effect on 9July 1, 2027.AB860,6,1010